Hawaii statutes.
[§421C-26] Cooperative agreements.
(a) Any association may enter into contracts, agreements, or arrangements with
other associations, individuals, joint-ventures, partnerships, or corporations,
for the cooperative and economical carrying on of its business.

(b) Any two or more associations by agreement
may unite in employing and using or separately employ and use the same
personnel, methods, means, and agencies for carrying on and conducting their
respective business. [L 1982, c 97, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next